Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Diesel Fuel Taxes

§ 39-17-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agricultural purposes” means the cultivation of soil, raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training and management of livestock, bees, poultry, furbearing animals and wildlife for gain, sale or profit, but excluding a custom operation;

“Bulk plant” means a fuel storage and distribution facility, other than a terminal, from which reportable fuel may be removed at a rack;

“Bulk diesel fuel” means thirty-five (35) gallons or more purchased and delivered at one (1) time, excluding diesel fuel delivered into the attached diesel fuel tanks or auxiliary tanks of a licensed motor vehicle;

“Commercial vehicle” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(i);

“Custom operation” means any agricultural purpose done for hire;

“Dealer” means any person who sells or offers to sell diesel fuel at a specific retail location in the state;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Distributor” means any person who receives diesel fuel for distribution for resale or use in this state;

“Dyed diesel fuel” means diesel fuel that is dyed pursuant to regulations issued by the United States internal revenue service or the department;

“Export” means to obtain diesel fuel in this state for sale or distribution in another state. Diesel fuel delivered out of Wyoming by or for the seller constitutes an export by the seller and diesel fuel delivered out of Wyoming by or for the purchaser constitutes an export by the purchaser;

“Exporter” means a person, other than a supplier, who purchases diesel fuel in this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, diesel fuel to another jurisdiction;

“Highway” means any road, thoroughfare or public way of any kind in Wyoming except United States forest service development roads and any public highway which is required to be maintained entirely at private expense;

“Import” means to bring diesel fuel into this state by any means of conveyance other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle. Diesel fuel delivered into this state from out of state by or for the seller constitutes an import by the seller, and diesel fuel delivered into this state from out of state by or for the purchaser constitutes an import by the purchaser;

“Importer” means any person other than a supplier who purchases diesel fuel out of this state for the purpose of transporting or delivering, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, the diesel fuel into this state for sale, use or distribution within this state;

“Lessor” means any person who, under the terms of a lease, grants the legal right of possession, control of and responsibility for the operation of a vehicle to another person;

“Person” means, for purposes of collecting the tax provided by W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii), an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock company or other association or entity, public or private;

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2.

“Position holder” means with respect to diesel fuels in a terminal, the person who holds the inventory position in the diesel fuels as reflected on the records of the terminal operator. A person holds the inventory position when that person has a contractual agreement with the terminal operator for use of the storage facilities or other terminal related services at a terminal with respect to diesel fuels. The term also includes a terminal operator who owns diesel fuels in a terminal;

“Rack” means a mechanism for delivering diesel fuels from a refinery or terminal into a transport truck, railroad car or other means of transfer that is outside of the terminal transfer system;

“Refiner” means any person who produces, refines, manufactures, blends or compounds diesel fuels in this state for use, sale or distribution;

“Diesel fuels” means those combustible gases and liquids commonly referred to as diesel fuel or any other volatile liquid of less than forty-six (46) degrees American petroleum industry gravity test, except liquid petroleum gas, when actually sold for use in motor vehicles for operation upon public roads and highways. The term “diesel fuels” includes jet fuel which is the volatile substance produced from petroleum, natural gas, oil, shale or coal and sold under the name of jet fuel and kerosene and any type of additive when the additive is mixed or blended into diesel fuel, excluding a pour point depressant. For the purposes of collecting the tax provided by W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii) the term “diesel fuel” includes all diesel fuel consumed or purchased for any and all purposes;

“Supplier” means a person that is:

Subject to the general taxing jurisdiction of this state;

Registered pursuant to section 4101 of the federal Internal Revenue Code for transactions in motor fuels in the bulk transfer/terminal distribution system; and

One (1) of the following:

The position holder in a terminal or refinery in this state;

An importer of motor fuel into this state from another jurisdiction;

A person who acquires motor fuel from a terminal or refinery from a position holder pursuant to a two-party exchange; or

The position holder in a terminal or refinery outside this state with respect to motor fuel which that person imports into this state on the account of that person.

“Supplier” also means a person that produces alcohol or alcohol derivative substances in this state, produces alcohol or alcohol derivative substances for import to this state into a terminal, or acquires upon import by truck or railcar into a terminal or refinery, alcohol or alcohol derivative substances.

“Terminal” means a diesel fuels storage and distribution facility that is supplied by pipeline or vessel, and from which diesel fuels may be removed at a rack;

“Terminal operator” means any person who owns, operates or otherwise controls a terminal;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Use” means the consumption of fuel in a motor vehicle upon a highway and includes the reception of diesel fuel into any tank on a motor vehicle which is used by the engine that generates motive power for the vehicle and, for the purposes of collecting the tax provided by W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii), includes all diesel fuels consumed for any and all purposes;

“User” means any person who uses diesel fuel within this state in an internal combustion engine for the generation of power to propel a motor vehicle upon a highway and, for the purposes of collecting the tax provided by W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii), includes any person who uses diesel fuel within this state for any and all purposes;

“Billed gallons” means the gallons billed to the customer;

“Accountable product” means any product that is subject to the reporting requirements of this state, regardless of its intended use or taxability;

“Alternative fuel” means as defined in W.S. 39-17-301(a)(iii);

“Biodiesel” means a fuel comprised of mono-alkyl esters of long chain fatty acids generally derived from vegetable oils or animal fats, designated B100, and meeting the requirements of ASTM D6751 for use in diesel engines;

“Biodiesel blend” means a blend of biodiesel fuel meeting ASTM D6751 with petroleum based diesel fuel, designated Bxx, where xx represents the volume percentage of biodiesel fuel in the blend;

“Common carrier” means a person, including a railroad operator, who transports accountable product and who does not own the product;

“Gallon” means gallon as measured on a gross basis as defined in this section;

“Gross gallon” means a measured gallon without temperature or barometric adjustments.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 1999, ch. 14, § 1; ch. 59, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 2; 2015 ch. 28, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), rewrote the definition of “‘Bulk plant’” to clarify the meaning of “fuel storage and distribution”; inserted the inclusion of the meaning of “jet fuel” in the definition of “‘Diesel fuels’” in (a)(xxi); and added (a)(xxix) through (a)(xxxv).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed (a)(xvii), which read: “‘Population’ means as defined in W.S. 39-15-101(a)(iii).”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote (a)(xxx).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(xxv), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-17-201

through

39-17-211

."

§ 39-17-202.
Administration; confidentiality.

The administration of this article is vested in the department which shall prescribe the reporting format and forms for the making of returns, and assessment and collection of license taxes and fees hereby imposed. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions hereof as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act necessary to the enforcement of the provisions of this article. All tax records specified in this article are open to examination by the director of the state department of audit or his deputies.

No state employee who by virtue of his employment has knowledge of the business affairs of any person filing or required to file any tax returns under this article shall make known its contents in any manner or permit any person to have access to any returns or information contained therein except as provided by law or in the following cases:

The delivery to the taxpayer or his legal representatives upon written request of a copy of any return or report in connection with his tax;

The publication of statistics so classified to prevent the identification of particular returns or reports;

The inspection by the attorney general of the report or return of any person who brings an action against the state, or against whom an action is contemplated or has been instituted;

The introduction into evidence of any report or return or information therefrom in any administrative or court proceeding to which the person making the report or return is a party;

The furnishing of any information to the United States government and its territories, the District of Columbia, any state allowing similar privileges to the department or to the multistate tax commission for relay to tax officials of cooperating states. Information furnished shall be only for tax purposes;

The inspection of tax returns and records by the department of audit.

Any person who violates subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with other jurisdictions, for the exchange of information and auditing of users of motor fuels used in fleets of motor vehicles operated or intended to operate interstate. An agreement, declaration of amendment is not effective until stated in writing and filed with the department.

An agreement may provide for determining the base jurisdiction for users, users records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, defining qualified motor vehicles, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of motor fuel taxes and penalties to another member jurisdiction, paying interest on certain refund requests and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

The department may, as required by the terms of an agreement, forward to officers or agents of another jurisdiction any information in the department’s possession relative to the manufacture, receipts, sale, use, transportation, or shipment of motor fuels by any person. The department may disclose to officers or agents of another member jurisdiction the location of officers, motor vehicles and other real and personal property of users of motor fuels.

An agreement may provide for each member jurisdiction to audit the records of persons based in the jurisdiction to determine if the motor fuel taxes due each jurisdiction are properly reported and paid. Each state shall forward the findings of the audits performed on persons based in the jurisdiction to each jurisdiction in which the person has taxable use of motor fuels. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of motor fuel in this state, the department may serve the audit findings received from another jurisdiction, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the department.

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section does not preclude the department from auditing the records of any licensee under this chapter.

If the department enters into any agreement under the authority of this section and the provisions set forth in the agreement are in conflict with any rules or regulations promulgated by the department, the agreement provisions prevail.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 14, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; 1999, ch. 14, § 2; 2007, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “reporting format and” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 39-17-203.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following shall apply:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax on all diesel fuels used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted in W.S.

39-17-205

;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 46 § 2.

A terminal operator or bulk plant operator may rely on the representation made by the purchaser of motor fuel or the purchaser’s agent concerning the destination state of the motor fuel. A purchaser is liable for any tax due as a result of the purchaser’s diversion of fuel from the represented destination state;

Any user not otherwise required to be licensed and report the tax levied pursuant to this section under the provisions of W.S.

39-17-207

or

39-17-206

shall be required to be licensed and report all taxes due under this section pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

39-17-206

and

39-17-207

.

Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

The state of Wyoming preempts the field of imposing taxes upon sales and use of diesel fuels and no city, town or county may levy or collect taxes upon the sales or use of diesel fuels;

The taxes imposed on diesel fuel shall be conclusively presumed to be a direct tax on the ultimate or retail consumer. When taxes are paid by any person other than the ultimate or retail consumer, the payment shall be considered as precollected and as an advance payment for the purpose of convenience and facility to the consumer and shall thereafter be added to the price of the diesel fuel and recovered from the ultimate or retail consumer, regardless of where or how the taxable fuel is ultimately consumed;

When a supplier, distributor, refiner, importer or exporter imports diesel fuel into or exports diesel fuel from the state of Wyoming in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles, the amount of diesel fuel consumed in the vehicles on Wyoming highways shall be deemed to be the product of the total amount of the diesel fuel consumed in his entire operations within and without this state times the total number of miles traveled on the highways within this state divided by the total number of miles traveled within and without the state. In the absence of mileage records, the department may by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-202(a) adopt the mileage basis for determining the taxable use of diesel fuel used in those motor vehicles which travel regularly over prescribed courses on and off the highways within the state of Wyoming. In the absence of records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of diesel fuel consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gallon of diesel fuel was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled;

A Wyoming licensed supplier, distributor, refiner or importer who is unable to recover the license taxes due from a bulk sale to a licensee who is other than an end-user and is not owned, rented or leased by the supplier, distributor, refiner or importer requesting the credit is not liable for the taxes and may credit the amount of unpaid taxes against a later remittance of taxes required under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i). The department shall promulgate rules to implement this paragraph.

Taxpayer. The following shall apply:

The taxes imposed on motor fuel shall be conclusively presumed to be a direct tax on the ultimate or retail consumer. When taxes are paid by any person other than the ultimate or retail consumer, the payment shall be considered as precollected and as an advance payment for the purpose of convenience and facility to the consumer and shall thereafter be added to the price of the motor fuel and recovered from the ultimate or retail consumer, regardless of where or how the taxable fuel is ultimately consumed;

A terminal operator, distributor or supplier may rely on the representation made by the purchaser of motor fuel or the purchaser’s agent concerning the destination state of the motor fuel. A distributor or supplier is liable for any tax due as a result of the distributor’s or supplier’s diversion of fuel from the represented destination state;

Every person who sells or offers to sell to the retail trade diesel fuels for use in motor vehicles shall conspicuously display a sign stating the price per gallon including all applicable taxes. The provision of this paragraph shall not apply to key lock or card lock fuel dispensing systems.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; ch. 108, § 2; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 88, § 2; 2015 ch. 46, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a)(ii).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed former (a)(ii), pertaining to suspension of collection of fuel taxes as specified.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-906, 39-6-909, 39-6-912 and 39-6-914, which were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments to those sections were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Constitutionality. —

The funding scheme enacted in prior similar section and former §§ 39-6-215, 39-6-302 and 39-6-305, whereby mineral severance tax revenues previously designated for the state highway fund were used to fund an underground storage tank program and were replaced in the highway fund with proceeds from an additional fuel tax, did not violate the requirement of art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., that any vehicle or gasoline tax be committed exclusively to public highway expenses. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

Exemption of LUST tax. —

Legislature's adoption of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-17-203

changed fuel taxes from a tax on wholesalers to a direct tax on the ultimate consumer. The statute requires that motor fuel taxes, including the Leaking Underground and Storage (LUST) tax, be added to the price of motor fuel. State v. Powder River Coal Co., 2004 WY 54, 90 P.3d 1158,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2004).

Underground storage tank funding scheme. —

An oil company's bare allegation that the state was funding an underground storage tank program by “fraudulently” transferring fuel tax proceeds required by art. 15, § 16, Wyo. Const., to be used for public highway expenses was insufficient to state a claim for fraud. V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 39-17-204.
Taxation rate.

Except as otherwise provided by this section and W.S.

39-17-205

, the total tax on diesel fuels shall be twenty-four cents ($.24) per gallon. The rate shall be imposed as follows:

There is levied and shall be collected a license tax of twenty-three cents ($.23) per gallon on all diesel fuels used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state;

In addition to the tax collected pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, there is levied and shall be collected a license tax of one cent ($.01) per gallon on all diesel fuels used, sold or distributed for sale or use in this state except for those fuels exempted in W.S.

39-17-205

(b) and (e);

Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of this subsection, jet fuel sold for use in aircraft shall be taxed at four cents ($.04) per gallon.

Amended and renumbered as (a)(ii) by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 1.

and (d) Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 15, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 28, § 3.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 2; ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 64, § 1; 2003, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 11, § 1; 2013 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 28, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (a)(iii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “twenty-four cents ($.24)” for “fourteen cents ($.14)” following “fuels shall be” in the introductory paragraph in (a); and substituted “twenty-three cents ($.23)” for “thirteen cents ($.13)” following “license tax of” in (a)(i).

The 2014 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2014, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, repealed (e), which specified diesel gallon equivalent for liquefied natural gas.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-909 and 39-6-914, which were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments to those sections were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 2013, ch. 49, § 2, directs:
“(a) Until June 30, 2014, any funds deposited
to the highway fund
which are attributable to the increase in fuel
taxes under this act
shall be separately accounted for by the department
of transportation
and shall only be expended to:

“(i) Maintain
the state highway system in the condition existing
as of the effective
date of this act; and

“(ii) Prepare
the report required by subsection (c) of this section.

“(b) Any funds
deposited to the highway fund which are attributable
to the increase
in fuel taxes under this act shall supplement and
shall not supplant
funds currently budgeted by the transportation
commission for purposes
of maintaining the state highway system in
the 2013-2014 fiscal biennium.

“(c) The department
of transportation shall provide a comprehensive
report to the joint
appropriations interim committee and joint transportation,
highways
and military affairs interim committee on or before November
1, 2013
on the condition of the state highway system and projected
revenue
requirements to maintain the current condition of the state
highway
system.”

Refund of LUST tax. —

Laws 2001, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 1, 2001, provides that all severance taxes distributed under title 39, chapter 14, to the corrective action account created by §

35-11-1424

and the financial responsibility account created by §

35-11-1427

are to be in the amount of fuel taxes collected under § 39-17-104(c), (§ 39-17-104(a)(iii)) and § 39-17-204(b), (§ 39-17-204(a)(ii)) less any refunds.

Exemption of LUST tax. —

Legislature's adoption of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

39-17-203

changed fuel taxes from a tax on wholesalers to a direct tax on the ultimate consumer. The statute requires that motor fuel taxes, including the Leaking Underground and Storage (LUST) tax, be added to the price of motor fuel. State v. Powder River Coal Co., 2004 WY 54, 90 P.3d 1158,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 39-17-205.
Exemptions.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

Diesel fuel sold at a Wyoming terminal rack for export, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a person licensed as an exporter in this state is exempt from the license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i) through (iii). The exempt sales shall be reported on or before the last day of the month in a format required by the department. The sales reports are invalid if not submitted to the department within one (1) year following the date of sale.

Exchanges or sales of diesel fuel between suppliers are exempt from the license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i). Diesel fuel directly exported, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a supplier is exempt from the license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i).

Dyed diesel fuel as defined in W.S. 39-17-201(a)(ix) is exempt from the license tax under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(i).

Diesel fuel directly exported, other than in the fuel supply tank of a motor vehicle, by a Wyoming licensed supplier is exempt from the additional license tax imposed under W.S. 39-17-204(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, § 3; 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), substituted “for export” for “and directly exported,” substituted “39-17-204(a)(i) through (iii)” for “39-17-204(a)(i) and (ii)” in the first sentence, deleted “business” following “last,” and substituted “in a format required” for “on forms provided” in the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-909, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. Some of the amendments to § 39-6-909 by ch. 51, § 2, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-904, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendment to § 39-6-904 by ch. 51, § 3 was subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-17-206.
Licenses; permits.

Every supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer or exporter shall annually obtain a diesel fuel tax license from the department to conduct business in this state for a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The license is not transferable and is valid for one (1) year or unless revoked by the department upon proof of violation of any provision of this article or surrendered by the licensee. Before beginning business as a supplier, refiner, distributor, terminal operator, importer or exporter, a person shall file an application with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department containing the information specified therein.

Every dealer shall annually obtain from the department a license to conduct business in the state. Prior to the commencement of business, an application for license shall be filed with the department on forms prescribed and furnished by the department setting forth the information as requested by the department. The application for the license shall state the location of each place where diesel fuel is to be sold or offered for sale. The license shall be used only for one (1) specific location by the dealer in whose name it is issued and may be revoked by the department upon proof of violation of the provisions of this article. The dealer shall immediately return the license upon the sale or discontinuance of any licensed location. The license fee is twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each location.

No person shall operate a commercial vehicle in Wyoming and in other jurisdictions unless the person has a valid international fuel tax agreement license and decals pursuant to W.S.

31-18-502

or a temporary permit under W.S.

31-18-201

.

Each applicant for international fuel tax agreement license and decals shall file an application in a form and manner prescribed by the department, and pay the fees for the license and decals as prescribed by the department pursuant to W.S

31-18-502

.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, each carrier licensed under the provisions of the international fuel tax agreement shall file, in a format prescribed by the department, a report indicating the total number of miles traveled in all jurisdictions by the operator’s vehicles subject to the tax under this section, the total number of miles traveled by those vehicles in this state, the amount of diesel fuel used by those vehicles in all jurisdictions, the amount of tax under this article paid during the calendar quarter and any other information required by the department to compute the licensee’s tax liability. The licensee shall pay all taxes due under this article at the time the report is filed. If the tax on diesel fuel imported into this state in the fuel supply tanks of motor vehicles for taxable use on Wyoming highways can be more accurately determined on a mileage basis the department may approve and adopt that basis. In the absence of mileage records showing the number of miles actually operated per gallon of diesel fuel consumed, it shall be presumed that not less than one (1) gallon of diesel fuel was consumed for every four (4) miles traveled. The department shall by rule promulgated pursuant to W.S. 39-17-202(a) prescribe procedures under which a diesel fuel user who is entitled to at least a two hundred fifty dollar ($250.00) refund of tax under this article for purchases and use of fuel in any calendar month may apply for and receive the refund at any time after the last day of that month.

Credit shall be given for tax paid on fuel purchased in Wyoming but not used in Wyoming and may be carried forward to succeeding reporting periods.

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 11, § 2.

The department may require bonds, or accept in lieu of a bond a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of paragraph (vi) of this subsection, under this article as follows:

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, all licensees shall file with the department a bond in the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), or the equivalent of the licensee’s tax liability for six (6) months, whichever is greater, at the discretion of the department. The department shall waive the bond if a licensee has established a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely with the department for the preceding three (3) years;

When a distributor who has been in business for three (3) years or longer and has established a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely with the department violates a provision of this article, the distributor shall file a bond with the department equal to the sum of the last available six (6) months tax liability;

The bond shall be executed with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business in this state. In lieu of a corporate surety bond, the department may accept a cash bond made payable to the department. Any interest earned on a cash bond shall accrue to the licensee. The bond shall be:

Approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

Made payable to the department;

Guarantee payment of delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article;

Conditioned on the applicant not practicing any fraud, making any fraudulent representation or violating any law relating to the conduct of the business for which the applicant is licensed under this article.

Notwithstanding the waiver of a bond authorized under paragraph (i) of this subsection, the department may require a bond from any licensee whose license has been revoked or who violates any provision of this article. Any licensee who fails to file any report required under this article, remits insufficient funds or is delinquent in filing any two (2) times in a preceding twelve (12) month period shall be required to post a bond as provided in this subsection. Such bond may be waived by the department after a demonstration of a good filing record which is complete, accurate and timely by the licensee for a twelve (12) month period;

Failure to post the required bond or certificate of deposit under this subsection shall result in the denial of a license;

In lieu of a surety or cash bond the department may accept a certificate of deposit under the following requirements:

The certificate of deposit:

Shall be issued by a financial institution authorized to do business in Wyoming and qualified by law to act as a depository of public funds in this state;

Shall be payable not more than one (1) year after being deposited with the department.

The department shall be given a first priority security interest in the certificate of deposit. The certificate of deposit shall not be subject to attachment or execution unless the attachment or execution arises out of a suit for delinquent taxes, penalties and interest due under this article and the return of the license issued under this article. The entire amount of the certificate of deposit shall be forfeited to the state if the licensee practices any fraud, makes any fraudulent representation or violates any law relating to the conduct of the business for which he is licensed under this article;

The certificate of deposit and related documents providing for the security interest and forfeiture shall be approved as to form by the Wyoming attorney general;

The licensee shall pay all cost incurred by the department to perfect its security interest;

Any interest earned on a certificate of deposit shall accrue to the licensee.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 51, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 72, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “highway fund” for “highway trust fund” in (j).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “pursuant to W.S

31-18-502

” in (c) and (d); substituted “the fees” for “a fee of ten dollars ($10.00)” in (d); and repealed former (j) which related to the collection of additional fees by the issuing agency from a licensee for annual decals issued pursuant to the international fuel tax agreement authorized by W.S.

39-17-202

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (k), inserted “or accept in lieu of a bond a certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of paragraph (vi) of this subsection”; in (k)(v), inserted “or certificate of deposit”; added (k)(vi), and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-903 and 39-6-913, which were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to those sections were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Laws 1998, ch. 51, § 3, amended W.S. 39-6-913. The amendments to § 39-6-913 by ch. 51, § 3, were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Existing bulk fuel user's licenses. —

Laws, 1986, ch. 87, § 3, provides: “The department shall designate all bulk fuel users licenses issued and valid on the effective date of this act wholesalers licenses without requiring payment of additional fees or submission of an additional application or bond.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”